Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 2. Governor and Lieutenant Governor.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

26 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

38 Am. Jur. 2d, Governor, § 2.

29 C.J.S., Elections, §§ 1(3), 70 — 74.

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 87 — 89.

What is “public place” within requirement as to posting of election notices. 90 ALR2d 1210.

Sec. 15.40.230.
Condition and time of calling special primary election and special election.

When a person appointed to succeed to the office of lieutenant governor succeeds to the office of acting governor, the acting governor shall, by proclamation, call a special primary election to be held on a date not less than 60, nor more than 90, days after the date the vacancy in the office of the governor occurred and a subsequent special election to be held on the first Tuesday that is not a state holiday occurring not less than 60 days after the special primary election. However, if the vacancy occurs on a date that is less than 60 days before or is on or after the date of the primary election in years in which a governor is regularly elected, the acting governor shall serve the remainder of the unexpired term and may not call a special election.

History.

(§ 8.31 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 32 ch 69 SLA 1970; § 50, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Cross references. —

For special election in case of second vacancy in office of governor, see AS

44.19.044

; for simultaneous vacancies, see AS

44.19.046

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, in the first sentence, substituted “special primary election” for “special election” following “call a”, and added “and a subsequent special election to be held on the first Tuesday that is not a state holiday occurring not less than 60 days after the special primary election” at the end.

Sec. 15.40.240.
Conditions for holding special primary election and special election with primary or general election.

If the vacancy occurs on a date not less than 60, nor more than 90, days before the date of the primary election in an election year in which a governor is not regularly elected, the acting governor shall, by proclamation, call the special primary election to be held on the date of the primary election and the special election to be held on the date of the general election, or, if the vacancy occurs on a date not less than 60, nor more than 90, days before the date of the general election in election years in which a governor is not regularly elected, the acting governor shall, by proclamation, call the special primary election to be held on the date of the general election with the subsequent special election to be held on the first Tuesday that is not a state holiday occurring not less than 60 days after the special primary and general election.

History.

(§ 8.32 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 33 ch 69 SLA 1970; § 51, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, substituted “in an election year in which a governor is not regularly elected, the acting governor shall, by proclamation, call the special primary election to be held on the date of the primary election and the special election to be held on the date of the general election,” for “in years in which a governor is regularly elected”, twice deleted “primary election or” following “the date of the”, substituted “special primary election” for “special election” following “call the”, and added “with the subsequent special election to be held on the first Tuesday that is not a state holiday occurring not less than 60 days after the special primary and general election” at the end.

Sec. 15.40.250.
Proclamation of special primary election and special election.

The acting governor shall issue the proclamation calling the special primary election and special election at least 50 days before the special primary election.

History.

(§ 8.33 ch 83 SLA 1960; § 52, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, inserted “calling the special primary election and special election” following “the proclamation” and “special primary” following “before the”.

Sec. 15.40.260.
Term of elected governor and lieutenant governor.

At the special election, a governor and a lieutenant governor shall be elected to fill the remainder of the unexpired terms and shall take office on the date the results of the special election are certified.

History.

(§ 8.34 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.40.270.
Date of nominations.

Candidates for the special election shall be nominated by petition transmitted by actual physical delivery of the petition in person or by mail postmarked not later than midnight of the filing date.

History.

(§ 8.35 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 20 ch 125 SLA 1962; am § 166 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 51 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, deleted “; or (3) by telegram or a copy in substance of the statements made in the petition to the director before the 21st day after the vacancy occurs” at the end, and made related changes.

Sec. 15.40.280.
Requirements of petition for candidates.

Petitions for the nomination of candidates must be executed under oath, state in substance that which is required for a declaration of candidacy under AS

15.25.030

, and include the fee required under AS

15.25.050(a)

.

History.

(§ 8.36 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 167 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 36 ch 85 SLA 1986; § 53, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, rewrote the section, which read, “Petitions for the nomination of candidates not representing a political party shall be signed by qualified voters of the state equal in number to at least one percent of the number of voters who cast ballots in the preceding general election, shall include nominees for the office of governor and lieutenant governor, and shall state in substance that which is required for nomination petitions by AS

15.25.180

”.

Sec. 15.40.290.
Requirements of party petition.

History.

[Repealed, § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2 SLA 2020.]

Sec. 15.40.300.
Selection of party nominees.

History.

[Repealed, § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2 SLA 2020.]

Sec. 15.40.310.
General provisions for conduct of the special primary election and special election.

Unless specifically provided otherwise, all provisions regarding the conduct of the primary and general election shall govern the conduct of the special primary election and special election of the governor and lieutenant governor, including provisions concerning voter qualifications; provisions regarding the duties, powers, rights, and obligations of the director, of other election officials, and of municipalities; provision for notification of the election; provision for payment of election expenses; provisions regarding employees being allowed time from work to vote; provisions for the counting, reviewing, and certification of returns; provisions for the determination of the votes and of recounts, contests, and appeal; and provision for absentee voting.

History.

(§ 8.39 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 5 2004 Ballot Measure No. 4; am § 7 ch 50 SLA 2004; § 54, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, inserted “primary and” following “conduct of the”, and “primary election and special” following “conduct of the special”.